scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     animikogaabawitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikogaabawitawaad
     animikogaabawitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikogaabawitaw
     animikowebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimikowebishkawaa
     animikowebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikowebishkawaan
     animikowebishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikowebishkawaad
     animikowebishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikowebishkawaad
     animikowebishkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikowebishkaw
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimikwabiitawaa
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimikwabiitawaa
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanimikwabiitawaa
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikwabiitawaan
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikwabiitawaad
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikwabiitawaad
     animikwabiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikwabiitaw
     animikwiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanimikwiitawaa
     animikwiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikwiitawaan
     animikwiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikwiitawaad
     animikwiitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enimikwiitawaad
     animikwiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: animikwiitaw
     anishinaabemonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanishinaabemonodawaa
     anishinaabemonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanishinaabemonodawaan
     anishinaabemonodaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anishinaabemonodawaad
     anishinaabemonodaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enishinaabemonodawaad
     anishinaabemonodaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anishinaabemonodaw
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanishinaabemotawaa
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanishinaabemotawaa
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanishinaabemotawaa
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanishinaabemotawaan
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anishinaabemotawaad
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enishinaabemotawaad
     anishinaabemotaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anishinaabemotaw
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanishinaabewibii'amawaa
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanishinaabewibii'amawaa
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanishinaabewibii'amawaa
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanishinaabewibii'amawaan
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anishinaabewibii'amawaad
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enishinaabewibii'amawaad
     anishinaabewibii'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anishinaabewibii'amaw
     anokiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanokiitawaa
     anokiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanokiitawaa
     anokiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanokiitawaa
     anokiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanokiitawaan
     anokiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anokiitawaad
     anokiitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enokiitawaad
     anokiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anokiitaw
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagajinaazhikamawaa
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapagajinaazhikamawaa
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapagajinaazhikamawaa
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagajinaazhikamawaan
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagajinaazhikamawaad
     apagajinaazhikamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagajinaazhikamawaad
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagajinaazhikawaa
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapagajinaazhikawaa
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapagajinaazhikawaa
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagajinaazhikawaad
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagajinaazhikawaan
     apagajinaazhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagajinaazhikawaad
     apagidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagidamawaa
     apagidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagidamowaa
     apagidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagidamawaan
     apagidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagidamowaan
     apagidamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagidamawaad
     apagidamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagidamowaad
     apagidamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagidamawaad
     apagidamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagidamowaad
     apagidamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apagidamaw
     apagidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapagidawaa
     apagidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapagidawaa
     apagidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapagidawaa
     apagidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapagidawaan
     apagidaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apagidawaad
     apagidaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epagidawaad
     apagidaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apagidaw
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapenimonodawaa
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapenimonodawaa
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapenimonodawaa
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapenimonodawaan
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apenimonodawaad
     apenimonodaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epenimonodawaad
     apenimonodaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apenimonodaw 
     apishimonikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapishimonikawaa
     apishimonikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapishimonikawaan
     apishimonikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apishimonikawaad
     apishimonikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epishimonikawaad
     apishimonikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apishimonikaw
     apishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapishkawaa
     apishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapishkawaan
     apishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apishkawaad
     apishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epishkawaad
     apishkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apishkaw
     asiginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasiginamawaa
     asiginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasiginamowaa
     asiginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasiginamawaan
     asiginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasiginamowaan
     asiginamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asiginamawaad
     asiginamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asiginamowaad
     asiginamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esiginamawaad
     asiginamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esiginamowaad
     asiginamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asiginamaw
     ashodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashodamawaa
     ashodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashodamawaan
     ashodamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashodamawaad
     ashodamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshodamawaad
     atamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindatamawaa
     atamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odatamawaan
     atamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: atamawaad
     atamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: etamawaad
     atamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: atamaw
     ataw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indatawaa
     ataw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindatawaa
     ataw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidatawaa
     ataw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odatawaan
     ataw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: atawaad
     ataw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: etawaad
     ataw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ataw 
     ayaaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indayaawaa
     ayaaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindayaawaa
     ayaaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidayaawaa
     ayaaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odayaawaan
     ayaaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawaad
     ayaaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eyaawaad
     ayaaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ayaaw
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenamawaa
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindazhenamawaa
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidazhenamawaa
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenamowaa
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenamawaan
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenamowaan
     azhenamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenamawaad
     azhenamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenamowaad
     azhenamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenamawaad
     azhenamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenamowaad
     azhenamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhenamaw
     azhenaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenaazhikawaa
     azhenaazhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenaazhikawaan
     azhenaazhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenaazhikawaad
     azhenaazhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenaazhikawaad
     azhenaazhikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhenaazhikaw
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenizha'amawaa
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenizha'amowaa
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenizha'amawaan
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenizha'amowaan
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenizha'amawaad
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenizha'amowaad
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenizha'amawaad
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenizha'amowaad 
     azhenizha'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhenizha'amaw
     azhenizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhenizhikawaa
     azhenizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: oddazhenizhikawaan
     azhenizhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenizhikawaad
     azhenizhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenizhikawaad
     azhenizhikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhenizhikaw
     azheshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazheshkawaa
     azheshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazheshkawaan
     azheshkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azheshkawaad
     azheshkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezheshkawaad
     azheshkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azheshkaw
     azhewebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhewebishkawaa
     azhewebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhewebishkawaan
     azhewebishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhewebishkawaad
     azhewebishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhewebishkawaad
     azhewebishkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhewebishkaw
     azhewidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhewidamowaa
     azhewidamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhewidamowaan
     azhewidamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhewidamowaad
     azhewidamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhewidamowaad
     azhewidamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhewidamaw
     azhewidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhewidawaa
     azhewidaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhewidawaan
     azhewidaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhewidawaad
     azhewidaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhewidawaad
     azhewidaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhewidaw
     aaba'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaba'amawaa
     aaba'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaba'amawaan
     aaba'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaba'amawaad
     aaba'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaba'amaw
     aabajitamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabajitamawaa
     aabajitamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabajitamawaan
     aabajitamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabajitamawaad
     aabajitamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabajitamawaad
     aabajitamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabajitamaw
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabaabika'amawaa
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabaabika'amawaa
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabaabika'amawaa
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaabika'amawaan
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabaabika'amawaad
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabaabika'amawaad
     aabaabika'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabaabika'amaw
     aabiskweginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabiskweginamawaa
     aabiskweginamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskweginamawaan
     aabiskweginamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiskweginamawaad
     aabiskweginamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskweginamawaad
     aabiskweginamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiskweginamaw
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaboozikawaa
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaboozikawaa
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaaboozikawaa
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaaboozikawaa
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboozikawaan
     aaboozikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboozikawaad
